sk-SK: Pozícia snímača: Most; Stredný; Krk; Iné
hu: Hangszedő elhelyezkedése: Híd; Középső; Nyak; Egyéb
nl: Positie pickup: Brug; Midden; Nek; Andere
el: Θέση μαγνήτη: Γέφυρα; Μέση; Λαιμός; Άλλο
sl-SI: Položaj magnetov: Mostiček; Srednja; Vrat; Drugo
it: Posizione del pickup: Ponte; Mezzo; Collo; Altro
da: Pickup-position: Bro; Midten; Nakke; Andet
lt-LT: Garso ėmiklio padėtis: Tiltelis; Vidurys; Grifas; Kita
pt-BR: Posição de coleta: Ponte; Meio; Pescoço; Outro
fi: Avolavan asento: Silta; Keski; Niska; Muu
ro-RO: Poziția dozei: Punte; Mijloc; Gât; Altele
ko: 가제트팔 위치: 브리지; 미들; 목; 기타
de: Position des Tonabnehmers: Brücke; Mitte; Hals; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Pozicija magneta: Most; Sredina; Vrat; Ostalo
tr: Pikap pozisyonu: Köprü; Orta; Boyun; Diğer
sv: Plats för pickup: Bro; Mitten; Nacke; Övrigt
cs: Pozice snímače: Most; Uprostřed; Krk; Jiné
vi: Vị trí bộ phận giữ kim máy quay đĩa: Ngựa đàn; Giữa; Cổ; Khác
ru: Положение звукоснимателя: Бридж; Средний; Гриф; Другое
ja: ピックアップの位置: ブリッジ; ミドル; 首; その他
es: Posición de la pastilla: Puente; Medio; Cuello; Otros
th: ตำแหน่งพิกอัป: สะพานสาย; ส่วนกลาง; คอ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 拾音器位置: 橋; 中間; 脖子; 其他
zh-CN: 拾音器位置: 桥; 中间; 颈项; 其他
fr: Position de retrait: Pont; Milieu; Cou; Autre
pl: Położenie przetwornika: Bridge; Średni; Szyja; Inne
nb: Pickup-stilling: Bro; Midt; Hals; Annet
pt-PT: Posição de pickup: Ponte; Meio; Pescoço; Outro
bg-BG: Позиция на пикап: Мост; Среда; Гриф; Други
en: Pickup position: Bridge; Middle; Neck; Other